Hawaii statutes.
[§211F-53] Limitation of liability. In
no case shall the corporation, officers or employees of the corporation, or the
State be liable for the monetary losses of individuals contributing to the
program. In all cases, the program manager shall inform individual
contributors of the risk involved in contributing to the program. [L 2000, c
297, pt of §33]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next